zh-CN: 投球防护网样式: 屏障网; 弓形框网; 外野挡网; 纯平网; 击球练习网; I 形网; L 形网; 安全挡网; 兜网; Z 形网; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo de tela de arremesso: Rede de barreira; Rede de arco; Rede de campo; Rede plana; Rede fungo; Rede em I; Rede em L; Rede de segurança; Rede em L com bolsa; Rede em Z; Outra
en: Pitching screen style: Barrier screen; Bow frame screen; Field screen; Flat screen; Fungo screen; I-screen; L-screen; Safety screen; Sock screen; Z-screen; Other
pl: Styl ekranu do narzutu: Siatka ochronna; Siatka z łukowatą ramą; Siatka polowa; Siatka płaska; Siatka do fungo; Siatka w kształcie litery I; Siatka w kształcie litery L; Siatka asekuracyjna; Siatka typu sock; Siatka w kształcie litery Z; Inny
bg-BG: Стил на защитната мрежа за хвърляне: Бариерен екран; Екран с извита рамка; Полеви екран; Плосък екран; Екран за тренировка (fungo); I-екран; L-екран; Предпазен екран; Екран с джоб (sock); Z-екран; Друго
sl-SI: Stil zaščitne mreže za metalce: Pregradna mreža; Mreža z upognjenim okvirjem; Mreža za igrišče; Ravna mreža; Mreža za trening z loparjem (Fungo); Mreža v obliki črke I; Mreža v obliki črke L; Varnostna mreža; Mreža z žepom (Sock); Mreža v obliki črke Z; Drugo
hu: Dobóvédőháló típusa: Védőfal; Íves keretű védőháló; Pályaháló; Lapos védőháló; Fungo védőháló; I-háló; L-háló; Biztonsági háló; Zsebes védőháló; Z-háló; Egyéb
ja: ピッチングスクリーンスタイル: バリアスクリーン; ボウフレームスクリーン; フィールドスクリーン; フラットスクリーン; ノックスクリーン; I型スクリーン; L型スクリーン; セーフティスクリーン; ソックスクリーン; Z型スクリーン; その他
lt-LT: Metimo apsauginio tinklo tipas: Uždangos formos ekranas; Lanko formos ekranas; Lauko ekranas; Plokščias ekranas; Tinklas muštiems kamuoliukams; I formos ekranas; L formos ekranas; Apsauginis ekranas; Kojinės formos ekranas; Z formos ekranas; Kita
nb: Kasterskjermstil: Barrierenett; Bueformet nett; Banenett; Flatt nett; Fungo-nett; I-nett; L-nett; Sikkerhetsnett; Sokkenett; Z-nett; Annet
ko: 피칭 스크린 방식: 배리어 스크린; 보우 프레임 스크린; 필드 스크린; 평면 스크린; 펑고 스크린; I형 스크린; L형 스크린; 안전 스크린; 양말형 스크린; Z형 스크린; 기타
fr: Type d’écran de lancer: Écran barrière; Écran à cadre en arc; Écran de terrain; Écran plat; Écran d’entraînement; Écran en I; Écran en L; Écran de sécurité; Écran à filet; Écran en Z; Autre
ru: Стиль питчерного экрана: Защитный экран; Экран с изогнутым каркасом; Полевой экран; Плоский экран; Экран Fungo; I-образный экран; L-образный экран; Экран безопасности; Экран с сеткой-карманом; Z-образный экран; Другое
de: Art des Pitching Screens: Barriere-Netz; Bogenrahmen-Netz; Feld-Netz; Flaches Netz; Fungo-Netz; I-Netz; L-Netz; Sicherheitsnetz; Sockennetz; Z-Netz; Andere
tr: Atış koruma perdesi stili: Bariyer ekranı; Yay çerçeveli ekran; Saha ekranı; Düz ekran; Fungo ekranı; I ekranı; L ekranı; Güvenlik ekranı; Çorap ekranı; Z ekranı; Diğer
zh-TW: 投球防護網款式: 阻擋網; 弓形網; 內野防護網; 平面網; 擊球練習防護網; I 型網; L 型網; 安全防護網; 袋型網; Z 型網; 其他
da: Kastenetstil: Barriere-net; Bueformet net; Banenet; Fladt net; Fungo-net; I-net; L-net; Sikkerhedsnet; Strømpenet; Z-net; Andet
el: Τύπος προστατευτικού διχτυού ρίψης: Δίχτυ φραγμού; Δίχτυ με τοξωτό σκελετό; Δίχτυ γηπέδου; Επίπεδο δίχτυ; Δίχτυ fungo; Δίχτυ τύπου I; Δίχτυ τύπου L; Δίχτυ ασφαλείας; Δίχτυ τύπου κάλτσας; Δίχτυ τύπου Z; Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl nadhadzovacej podložky: Bariérová sieť; Sieť s ohnutým rámom; Poliarska sieť; Plochá sieť; Fungo sieť; Sieť v tvare I; Sieť v tvare L; Bezpečnostná sieť; Sieť s vreckom (Sock screen); Sieť v tvare Z; Iné
sv: Pitching-skärmstil: Barriärskärm; Bågskärm; Fältskärm; Platt skärm; Fungo-skärm; I-skärm; L-skärm; Säkerhetsskärm; Sockskärm; Z-skärm; Övrigt
nl: Werpscherm stijl: Barrièrescherm; Boogframescherm; Veldscherm; Plat scherm; Fungo-scherm; I-scherm; L-scherm; Veiligheidsscherm; Sokscherm; Z-scherm; Overig
vi: Phong cách màn hình trình chiếu: Lưới chắn rào; Lưới khung hình cung; Lưới chắn trên sân; Lưới phẳng; Lưới fungo; Lưới chữ I; Lưới chữ L; Lưới an toàn; Lưới dạng túi; Lưới chữ Z; Khác
hr-HR: Stil ekrana za bacanje: Zaštitna mreža; Mreža sa zakrivljenim okvirom (Bow frame); Mreža za teren; Ravna mreža; Fungo mreža; Mreža I; Mreža L; Sigurnosna mreža; Mreža u obliku čarape (Sock screen); Mreža Z; Ostalo
cs: Styl odpalovací sítě: Ochranná síť; Síť s obloukovým rámem; Polní síť; Plochá síť; Fungo síť; I-síť; L-síť; Bezpečnostní síť; Síť s kapsou (sock net); Z-síť; Ostatní
es: Estilo de pantalla protectora para lanzamiento: Pantalla de barrera; Pantalla con marco arqueado; Pantalla de campo; Pantalla plana; Pantalla de fungo; Pantalla en I; Pantalla en L; Pantalla de seguridad; Pantalla tipo calcetín; Pantalla en Z; Otra
fi: Syöttösuojan tyyppi: Suojaverkko; Jousirunkoinen verkko; Kenttäverkko; Tasainen verkko; Fungo-verkko; I-verkko; L-verkko; Turvaverkko; Pussiverkko; Z-verkko; Muu
pt-BR: Tela de arremesso estilo: Tela de barreira; Tela de estrutura em arco; Tela de campo; Tela plana; Tela fungo; Tela em I; Tela em L; Tela de segurança; Tela tipo meia; Tela em Z; Outros
ro-RO: Stilul ecranului de lansare: Plasă de barieră; Plasă cu cadru curbat; Plasă de teren; Plasă plată; Plasă fungo; Plasă în formă de I; Plasă în formă de L; Plasă de siguranță; Plasă tip șosetă; Plasă în formă de Z; Altele
it: Stile dello schermo di lancio: Rete barriera; Rete con telaio ad arco; Rete da campo; Rete piatta; Rete per fungo; Rete a I; Rete a L; Rete di sicurezza; Rete a calza; Rete a Z; Altro
th: สไตล์หน้าจอการนำเสนอ: ตาข่ายกั้น; ตาข่ายทรงโค้ง; ตาข่ายฝึกซ้อมในสนาม; ตาข่ายทรงแบน; ตาข่ายตีลูก (Fungo screen); ตาข่ายรูปตัว I; ตาข่ายรูปตัว L; ตาข่ายนิรภัย; ตาข่ายดักลูก; ตาข่ายรูปตัว Z; อื่นๆ